Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1906.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-707c of Title 63, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A hospital shall not, as a condition of employment, contract,


internship, training, residency, or other similar arrangement,


require any physician, nurse, or other health care provider or any


health care student, resident, intern, or trainee to be vaccinated


against COVID-19 or any other disease, and shall not discriminate


against any such individual due to his or her vaccination status.



Req. No. 3510 Page 1


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 1210.189, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 1210.189. A. A board of education of a public school


district or a technology center school district, the board of


regents of an institution within The Oklahoma State System of Higher


Education, the governing board of a private postsecondary


educational institution, the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher


Education, the State Board of Education or the State Board of Career


and Technology Education shall not:


1. Require a vaccination against Coronavirus disease 2019


(COVID-19) as a condition of admittance to or attendance of the


school or institution;


2. Require a vaccine passport as a condition of admittance to


or attendance of the school or institution; or


3. Implement a mask mandate for students who have not been


vaccinated against COVID-19.


B. As used in this section, “vaccine passport” means


documentation that an individual has been vaccinated against COVID-


19.


C. Nothing in this section shall be construed to apply to any


public or private healthcare setting.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby



Req. No. 3510 Page 2


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-3510 DC 1/15/2026 8:43:00 AM









































Req. No. 3510 Page 3